Utah statutes.
53C-1-103.   Definitions.

As used in this title:

(1)  "Administration" means the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration.

(2)  "Board" or "board of trustees" means the School and Institutional Trust Lands Board of Trustees.

(3)  "Director" or "director of school and institutional trust lands" means the chief executive officer of the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration.

(4)  "Mineral" includes oil, gas, and hydrocarbons.

(5)  "Nominating committee" means the committee that nominates candidates for positions and vacancies on the board.

(6)  "Policies" means statements applying to the administration that broadly prescribe a future course of action and guiding principles.

(7)  "Primary beneficiary representative" means the State Board of Education acting as representative on behalf of the following trusts:

(a)  the trust established for common schools;

(b)  the trust established for schools for the blind; and

(c)  the trust established for schools for the deaf.

(8)  "School and institutional trust lands" or "trust lands" means those properties granted by the United States in the Utah Enabling Act to the state in trust, and other lands transferred to the trust, which must be managed for the benefit of:

(a)  the state's public education system; or

(b)  the institutions of the state which are designated by the Utah Enabling Act as beneficiaries of trust lands.



Amended by Chapter 224, 2012 General Session

